Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Subchapter 12. Persons in Need of Guardianship

§ 3060.
Policy.

Guardianship shall be utilized only as necessary to promote the well-being of the individual and to protect the individual from violations of his or her human and civil rights. It shall be designed to encourage the development and maintenance of maximum self-reliance and independence in the individual and only the least restrictive form of guardianship shall be ordered to the extent required by the individual’s actual mental and adaptive limitations. The State of Vermont recognizes the fundamental right of an adult with capacity to determine the extent of health care the individual will receive.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 76

, § 15; amended

2007, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3061.
Definitions.

The words and phrases used in this subchapter shall be defined as follows:

“Person in need of guardianship” means a person who:

is at least 18 years of age; and

is unable to manage, without the supervision of a guardian, some or all aspects of his or her personal or financial affairs as a result of:

significantly subaverage intellectual functioning which exists concurrently with deficits in adaptive behavior; or

a physical or mental condition that results in significantly impaired cognitive functioning which grossly impairs judgment, behavior, or the capacity to recognize reality.

“Unable to manage his or her personal care” means the inability, as evidenced by recent behavior, to meet one’s needs for medical care, nutrition, clothing, shelter, hygiene, or safety so that physical injury, illness, or disease has occurred or is likely to occur in the near future.

“Unable to manage his or her financial affairs” means gross mismanagement, as evidenced by recent behavior, of one’s income and resources which has led or is likely in the near future to lead to financial vulnerability.

“Near relative” means a parent, stepparent, brother, sister, grandparent, spouse, domestic partner, or adult child.

“Interested person” means a responsible adult who has a direct interest in a person in need of guardianship and includes the person in need of guardianship, a near relative, a close friend, a guardian, public official, social worker, physician, agent named in an advance directive or in a power of attorney, person nominated as guardian in an advance directive, or member of the clergy.

“Respondent” means a person who is the subject of a petition filed pursuant to section 3063 of this title or a person under guardianship who is the subject of any subsequent petition, motion, or action filed pursuant to this subchapter.

“Party” shall have the same meaning as defined by Rule 17(a)(3) and (b) of the Vermont Rules of Probate Procedure.

“Person under guardianship” means a person in need of guardianship for whom a guardianship order has been issued.

“Do not resuscitate order” shall have the same meaning as in

18 V.S.A. § 9701(7)

.

“Capacity to make medical decisions” means an individual’s ability to make and communicate a decision regarding proposed health care based upon having a basic understanding of the diagnosed condition and the benefits, risks, and alternatives to the proposed health care.

“Informed consent” means the consent given voluntarily by an individual with capacity after being fully informed of the nature, benefits, risks, and consequences of the proposed health care, alternative health care, and no health care.

“Assent” means a communication by a person under guardianship that a proposed health care decision by his or her guardian is consistent with his or her preferences, when that person has been found to lack the capacity to provide informed consent.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 76

, § 15; amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 156;

1989, No. 191

(Adj. Sess.);

2005, No. 198

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 9, 15, eff. Sept. 1, 2006;

2007, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3062.
Jurisdiction; review of guardian’s actions.

If this State has jurisdiction of a guardianship proceeding pursuant to chapter 114 of this title, then the Probate Division of the Superior Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the proceedings. All proceedings to determine whether this court has jurisdiction pursuant to chapter 114 of this title shall be brought in the Probate Division of the Superior Court.

The Probate Division of the Superior Court shall have exclusive original jurisdiction over all proceedings brought under the authority of this chapter or pursuant to

18 V.S.A. § 9718

.

The Probate Division of the Superior Court shall have supervisory authority over guardians. Any interested person may seek review of a guardian’s proposed or past actions by filing a motion with the court.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 76

, § 15; amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 157;

2005, No. 55

, § 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2005;

2007, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 125, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2011, No. 56

, § 26.

§ 3063.
Petition for guardianship.

An interested person may file a petition with the Probate Division of the Superior Court for the appointment of a guardian. The petition shall state:

the names and addresses of the petitioner and the respondent; if known, the name and address of a near relative of the respondent; the name and address of the person nominated as guardian in an advance directive; and the name and address of the current guardian, and agent named in an advance directive or in a power of attorney;

the interest of the petitioner in the respondent;

that the respondent is alleged to be a person in need of guardianship, and that the respondent is at least 18 years of age or will become 18 years of age within four months of the filing of a petition;

specific reasons with supporting facts why guardianship is sought;

the specific areas where supervision and protection is requested and the powers of the guardian requested for inclusion in the court’s order;

the nature, description, and approximate value of the respondent’s income and resources, including public benefits and pension;

if a specific individual is proposed as guardian, the name and address of the proposed guardian and the relationship of the proposed guardian to the respondent; and

alternatives to guardianship that have been considered and an explanation as to why each alternative is unavailable or unsuitable.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 76

, § 15; amended

1983, No. 91

, § 8;

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 158;

2005, No. 198

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. Sept. 1, 2006;

2007, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 3064.
Notice of petition and hearing.

Upon the filing of the petition, the Probate Division of the Superior Court shall schedule a hearing and notice shall be given as provided by the Rules of Probate Procedure.

The hearing shall be held not less than 15 nor more than 30 days after the filing with the court of the evaluation required by section 3067 of this title. The hearing may be continued for good cause shown for not more than 15 additional days.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 76

, § 15; amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 159;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 3065.
Counsel.

The respondent shall have the right to be represented by counsel of his or her own choosing at any stage of a guardianship proceeding. Unless a respondent is already represented, the court:
(a) (1) The respondent shall have the right to be represented by counsel of his or her own choosing at any stage of a guardianship proceeding. Unless a respondent is already represented, the court:

shall appoint counsel for the respondent when an initial petition for guardianship is filed;

shall appoint counsel for the respondent in any subsequent proceeding if the respondent or a party requests appointment in writing; and

may appoint counsel for the respondent on the court’s initiative in any subsequent proceeding.

Appointed counsel shall have the right to withdraw upon conclusion of the proceeding for which he or she has been appointed.

Counsel shall receive a copy of the petition upon appointment and copies of all other documents upon filing with the court. Counsel shall consult with the respondent prior to any hearing and, to the maximum extent possible, explain to the respondent the meaning of the proceedings and of all relevant documents. Counsel for the respondent shall act as an advocate for the respondent and shall not substitute counsel’s own judgment for that of the respondent on the subject of what may be in the best interests of the respondent. Counsel’s role shall be distinct from that of a guardian ad litem if one is appointed. At a minimum, counsel shall endeavor to ensure that:

the wishes of the respondent, including those contained in an advance directive, as to the matter before the court are presented to the court;

there is no less restrictive alternative to guardianship or to the matter before the court;

proper due process procedure is followed;

no substantial rights of the respondent are waived, except with the respondent’s consent and the court’s approval, provided that the evaluation and report required under section 3067 of this title and the hearing required under section 3068 of this title may not be waived;

the petitioner proves allegations in the petition by clear and convincing evidence in an initial proceeding, and applicable legal standards are met in subsequent proceedings;

the proposed guardian is a qualified person to serve or to continue to serve, consistent with section 3072 of this title; and

if a guardian is appointed, the initial order or any subsequent order is least restrictive of the personal freedom of the person under guardianship consistent with the need for supervision.

Respondent’s counsel shall be compensated from the respondent’s estate unless the respondent is found indigent in accordance with Rule 3.1 of the Rules of Civil Procedure. For indigent respondents, the court shall maintain a list of pro bono counsel from the private bar to be used before appointing nonprofit legal services organizations to serve as counsel.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 76

, § 15; amended

1991, No. 38

, § 1;

2005, No. 198

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. Sept. 1, 2006;

2007, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3066.
Guardian ad litem.

On motion of the respondent’s or person under guardianship’s counsel or on the court’s own motion, the court may appoint a guardian ad litem if it finds the respondent or person under guardianship is unable to communicate with or advise counsel.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 76

, § 15; amended

1991, No. 38

, § 2;

2007, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3067.
Evaluation and report; background check; release of evaluation.

When a petition is filed pursuant to section 3063 of this title, or when a motion for modification or termination is filed pursuant to subdivision 3077(a)(4) of this title, the court shall order an evaluation of the respondent. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the cost of the evaluation shall be paid for out of the respondent’s estate or as ordered by the court. If the respondent is unable to afford some or all of the cost of the evaluation without expending income or liquid resources necessary for living expenses, the court shall order that the Department of Mental Health or the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living provide the evaluation through qualified evaluators.

The evaluation shall be performed by someone who has specific training and demonstrated competence to evaluate a person in need of guardianship. The evaluation shall be completed within 30 days of the filing of the petition with the court unless the time period is extended by the court for cause.

The evaluation shall:

describe the nature and degree of the respondent’s disability, if any, and the level of the respondent’s intellectual, developmental, and social functioning;

contain recommendations, with supporting data, regarding:

those aspects of his or her personal care and financial affairs that the respondent can manage without supervision or assistance;

those aspects of his or her personal care and financial affairs that the respondent could manage with the supervision or assistance of support services and benefits;

those aspects of his or her personal care and financial affairs that the respondent is unable to manage without the supervision of a guardian;

those powers and duties as set forth in sections 3069 and 3071 of this title that should be given to the guardian, including the specific support services and benefits that should be obtained by the guardian for the respondent.

The proposed guardian shall provide the court with the information and consents necessary for a complete background check. Not more than 14 days after receipt of an evaluation supporting guardianship of the respondent, the court shall order from the respective registries background checks of the proposed guardian from any available State registries, including the Adult Abuse Registry, Child Abuse Registry, Vermont Crime Information Center, and the Vermont State Sex Offender Registry, and the court shall consider information received from the registries in determining whether the proposed guardian is suitable. However, if appropriate under the circumstances, the court may waive the background reports or may proceed with appointment of a guardian prior to receiving the background reports, provided that the court may remove a guardian if warranted by background reports that the court receives after the guardian’s appointment. If the proposed guardian has lived in Vermont for fewer than five years or is a resident of another state, the court may order background checks from the respective state registries of the states in which the proposed guardian lives or has lived in the past five years or from any other source. The court shall provide copies of background check reports to the petitioner, the respondent, and the respondent’s attorney.

Regardless of whether the report of the evaluator supports or does not support guardianship, the court shall provide a copy of the evaluation to the respondent, the respondent’s attorney, the petitioner, the guardian upon appointment, and any other individual, including the proposed guardian, determined by the court to have a strong interest in the welfare of the respondent. The evaluation shall remain confidential, and recipients of the evaluation are prohibited from sharing the evaluation. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the court may restrict access to the evaluation or portions of the evaluation upon objection by one of the parties or on the court’s own motion.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 76

, § 15; amended

1989, No. 187

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1995, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

2007, No. 15

, § 7;

2007, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2017, No. 11

, § 35.

Particular cases.

Although the probate court had the authority to seal an initial evaluation in a guardianship proceeding, it erred in sealing the evaluation here. It did not act out of concern for the privacy of the ward or other confidentiality interests; rather, its concern was that the entity which performed the evaluation might have a legal obligation to take further action with respect to the ward than it would not otherwise have had if the evaluation had been limited to what was permitted under another statute. In re Guardianship of A.S., 2012 VT 70, 192 Vt. 631, 57 A.3d 716, 2012 Vt. LEXIS 68 (2012) (mem.).

§ 3068.
Hearing.

The respondent, the petitioner and all other persons to whom notice has been given pursuant to section 3064 of this title may attend the hearing and testify. The respondent and the petitioner may subpoena, present, and cross-examine witnesses, including those who prepared the evaluation. The court may exclude any person not necessary for the conduct of the hearing on motion of the respondent.

The hearing shall be conducted in a manner consistent with orderly procedure and in a setting not likely to have a harmful effect on the mental or physical health of the respondent.

The evaluation shall be received into evidence, if the persons who prepared the evaluation are available for the hearing or subject to service of subpoena. However, the court shall not be bound by the evidence contained in the evaluation, but shall make its determination upon the entire record. In all cases, the court shall make specific findings of fact, state separately its conclusions of law and direct the entry of an appropriate judgment.

The petitioner may be represented by counsel in any proceedings brought under this chapter.

If upon completion of the hearing and consideration of the record the court finds that the respondent is not a person in need of guardianship, it shall dismiss the petition and seal the records of the proceeding.

If upon completion of the hearing and consideration of the record the court finds that the petitioner has proved by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent is a person in need of guardianship or will be a person in need of guardianship on attaining 18 years of age, it shall enter judgment specifying the powers of the guardian pursuant to sections 3069 and 3070 of this title and the duties of the guardian pursuant to section 3071 of this title.

Any party to the proceeding before the court may appeal the court’s decision in the manner provided in section 3080 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 76

, § 15; amended

1983, No. 91

, § 9;

2007, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3068a.
Rights of a person under guardianship.

A person under guardianship retains the same legal and civil rights guaranteed to all Vermont residents under the Vermont and U.S. constitutions and all the laws and regulations of Vermont and the United States. These rights include:

The right to participate in decisions made by the guardian and to have personal preferences followed unless:

the preference is unreasonable and would result in actual harm; or

the person under guardianship does not have a basic understanding of the benefits and consequences of his or her chosen preference.

The right, without interference from anyone, to retain an attorney and to communicate freely with counsel, the court, ombudsmen, advocates of his or her choosing, and other persons authorized by law to act as an advocate for the person under guardianship.

The right to retain an attorney and seek legal advice independently without consent of the guardian, provided that any legal fees not authorized by the guardian are subject to review and approval by the court.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 198

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. Sept. 1, 2006; amended

2007, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3069.
Powers of a guardian.

If the court enters judgment pursuant to subsection 3068(f) of this title, it may appoint a guardian if it determines that the respondent is unable to manage, without the supervision of a guardian, any or all aspects of his or her personal care and financial affairs.

When the person under guardianship has an advance directive, the authority of the agent and the instructions contained therein shall remain in effect unless the Probate Division of the Superior Court expressly orders otherwise in a petition for review of the advance directive under

18 V.S.A. § 9718

.

The court shall grant powers to the guardian in the least restrictive manner appropriate to the circumstances of the respondent and consistent with any advance directive. Guardianship powers shall be ordered only to the extent required by the respondent’s actual mental and adaptive limitations. The court shall specify which of the following powers the guardian shall have and may further restrict each power so as to preserve the respondent’s authority to make decisions commensurate with respondent’s ability to do so:

The power to exercise general supervision over the person under guardianship. This includes care, habilitation, education, and employment of the person under guardianship and choosing or changing the residence, subject to the requirements of sections 2691, 3073, and 3074 of this title.

The power to seek, obtain, and give or withhold consent to the initiation or continuation of medical or dental treatment, subject to the provisions of section 3075 of this title and any constitutional right of the person under guardianship to refuse treatment, provided that the court in its discretion may place limitations on the guardian’s powers under this subdivision if appropriate under the circumstances, including requiring prior court approval for specific surgeries, procedures, or treatments.

The power to exercise general financial supervision over the income and resources of the person under guardianship. This includes the power to seek or apply for, receive, invest, and expend all wages, compensation, insurance benefits, public benefits, and pensions for the benefit of the person under guardianship, to liquidate personal property for the benefit of the person under guardianship, to settle accounts, demands, claims, and actions by or against the person under guardianship, and to take any other action reasonably necessary to secure, preserve, protect, and defend the financial interests of the person under guardianship.

The power to approve or withhold approval of any contract, except for necessaries, which the person under guardianship wishes to make.

The power to approve or withhold approval of the sale or encumbrance of real property of the person under guardianship subject to subchapter 6 of this chapter.

The power to obtain legal advice and to commence or defend against court actions in the name of the person under guardianship.

When a guardian has been granted some but not all guardianship powers, the guardianship shall be identified as a “limited guardianship” and the guardian identified as a “limited guardian.”
(d) (1) When a guardian has been granted some but not all guardianship powers, the guardianship shall be identified as a “limited guardianship” and the guardian identified as a “limited guardian.”

A person for whom limited guardianship has been granted retains all the powers identified in subsection (c) of this section except those which have been specifically granted to the limited guardian.

The guardian shall exercise supervisory powers in a manner which is least restrictive of the personal freedom of the person under guardianship consistent with the need for supervision.

The guardian shall encourage the person under guardianship to participate in decisions, to act on his or her own behalf when practicable, and to develop or regain the capacity to manage his or her own personal affairs to the maximum extent possible. The wishes, values, beliefs, and preferences of the person under guardianship shall be respected to the greatest possible extent in the exercise of all guardianship powers.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 76

, § 15; amended

2005, No. 198

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Sept. 1, 2006;

2007, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 3070.
Repealed. 2007, No. 186 (Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3071.
Duties of guardian.

The guardian shall maintain close contact with the person under guardianship and encourage maximum self-reliance on the part of the person under guardianship.

In addition to the powers vested in the guardian by the court pursuant to section 3069 of this title, the court may order the guardian to assure that the person under guardianship receives those benefits and services to which he or she is lawfully entitled and needs to maximize his or her opportunity for social and financial independence. Those benefits and services include, but are not limited to:

education services for a person under guardianship who is of school age;

residential services for a person under guardianship who lacks adequate housing;

nutrition services;

medical and dental services, including home health care;

therapeutic and habilitative services, adult education, vocational rehabilitation, or other appropriate services.

The guardian shall always serve the interests of the person under guardianship and shall bring any potential conflicts of interest to the attention of the court.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 76

, § 15; amended

2007, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3072.
Guardians; individuals who may serve.

Competent individuals of at least 18 years of age may serve as guardians.
(a) (1) Competent individuals of at least 18 years of age may serve as guardians.

No individual may be appointed or serve as guardian for a person under or in need of guardianship if the individual operates a boarding home, residential care home, assisted living residence, nursing home, group home, developmental home, correctional facility, psychiatric unit at a designated hospital, or other similar facility in which the person under or in need of guardianship resides or is receiving care.

No person may serve as guardian for the respondent who has served as guardian ad litem in the same proceeding.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 2603 of this title, the court shall have the discretion to appoint a guardian who is not a resident of this State, provided that the individual appointed is otherwise qualified to serve.

In appointing an individual to serve as guardian, the court shall take into consideration:

the nomination of a guardian in an advance directive or in a will;

any current or past expressed preferences of the respondent;

the geographic location of the proposed guardian;

the relationship of the proposed guardian and the respondent;

the ability of the proposed guardian to carry out the powers and duties of the guardianship;

the willingness and ability of the proposed guardian to communicate with the respondent and to respect the respondent’s choices and preferences;

potential financial conflicts of interest between the respondent and the proposed guardian, and any conflicts that may arise if the proposed guardian is an employee of a boarding home, residential care home, assisted living residence, nursing home, group home, developmental home, correctional facility, psychiatric unit at a designated hospital, or other similar facility in which the respondent resides or is receiving care; and

results of any background checks.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 76

, § 15; amended

1983, No. 91

, § 7;

1985, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2007, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3073.
Change of residential placement.

When a guardian who has been granted the power to choose or change the residence of the person under guardianship pursuant to subdivision 3069(c)(1) of this title wishes to admit the person under guardianship to a nursing home or change the residential placement of the person under guardianship from a private home to a boarding home, residential care home, assisted living residence, group home, or other similar facility, the guardian must first file a motion for permission to do so.
(a) (1) When a guardian who has been granted the power to choose or change the residence of the person under guardianship pursuant to subdivision 3069(c)(1) of this title wishes to admit the person under guardianship to a nursing home or change the residential placement of the person under guardianship from a private home to a boarding home, residential care home, assisted living residence, group home, or other similar facility, the guardian must first file a motion for permission to do so.

For any other change of residence sought by a guardian who has been granted the power to choose or change the residence of the person under guardianship pursuant to subdivision 3069(c)(1) of this title, the guardian shall give notice to all parties and to such other persons as the court directs as soon as practicable prior to the change of placement.

In an emergency, a guardian who has been granted the power to choose or change the residence of the person under guardianship pursuant to subdivision 3069(c)(1) of this title may change the residential placement of the person under guardianship without petitioning the court for prior permission or without giving prior notice to parties. Immediately after any emergency change in residential placement for which prior permission under subsection (a) of this section would be required in the absence of an emergency, the guardian shall file a motion for permission to continue the placement.
(b) (1) In an emergency, a guardian who has been granted the power to choose or change the residence of the person under guardianship pursuant to subdivision 3069(c)(1) of this title may change the residential placement of the person under guardianship without petitioning the court for prior permission or without giving prior notice to parties. Immediately after any emergency change in residential placement for which prior permission under subsection (a) of this section would be required in the absence of an emergency, the guardian shall file a motion for permission to continue the placement.

Immediately after any emergency change of placement for which prior permission under subsection (a) of this section is not required, the guardian shall give notice of the change of placement to all parties and to such other persons as the court directs.

Any party may request a hearing on a change in residential placement. The hearing shall be set for the earliest possible date and shall be given precedence over other probate matters.

In a hearing on a change of placement, the court shall consider:

the need for the change of placement;

the appropriateness of the new placement;

the wishes of the person under guardianship, if known; and

whether the guardian has considered alternatives.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 76

, § 15; amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 160;

1985, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2005, No. 198

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. May 30, 2006;

2007, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3074.
Commitment, sterilization, involuntary treatment, and involuntary medication.

Nothing in this chapter shall give the guardian of a person authority to:

place that person in a State school or hospital except pursuant to

18 V.S.A. § 7601

et seq. or

18 V.S.A. § 8801

et seq.

consent to an involuntary treatment or medication petition pursuant to 18 V.S.A. chapter 181.

consent to sterilization or to a petition for involuntary sterilization pursuant to 18 V.S.A. chapter 204.

consent to a petition for custody, care, or habilitation filed pursuant to 18 V.S.A. chapter 206.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 76

, § 15; amended

2007, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3075.
Consent for medical or dental treatment.

A person under guardianship retains the right to make medical and dental decisions unless that right has been restricted pursuant to subdivision 3069(c)(2) of this title.

A person whose right to make medical decisions has been restricted pursuant to subdivision 3069(c)(2) of this section who has the capacity to make a specific medical decision retains the right to make that decision.

Unless an advance directive or the authority of an agent is expressly revoked or modified by the court pursuant to

18 V.S.A. § 9718

, the advance directive of a person under guardianship shall remain in effect, and the agent shall have sole authority to make health care decisions for the person under guardianship pursuant to 18 V.S.A. chapter 231.

If there is no agent named in the advance directive, or if the office of agent is vacant, the guardian shall follow the instructions contained in the advance directive.

For a person whose right to consent to medical or dental procedures has been restricted pursuant to subdivision 3069(c)(2) of this title, the guardian may give or withhold consent pursuant to this section and subject to any constitutional right of the person under guardianship to refuse treatment.

Consent to the procedure shall be given or withheld consistent with the manner in which the person under guardianship would have given or withheld consent, provided there is sufficient information concerning the person’s wishes. In making this determination, the guardian and the court in reviewing a guardian’s decision under this section shall:

Rely on written and oral expressions of the person under guardianship.

Rely on available information concerning the wishes, values, beliefs, and preferences of the person under guardianship if the person’s written and oral expressions do not provide sufficient information.

Follow the best interests of the person under guardianship if subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection are inapplicable. No decision to withhold or abate medical treatment will be based solely on the age, economic level, or level of disability of the person under guardianship.

The guardian shall obtain prior written approval by the Probate Division of the Superior Court following notice and hearing:
(g) (1) The guardian shall obtain prior written approval by the Probate Division of the Superior Court following notice and hearing:

If the person under guardianship objects to the guardian’s decision, on constitutional grounds or otherwise.

If the court orders prior approval for a specific surgery, procedure, or treatment, either in its initial order pursuant to subdivision 3069(c)(2) of this title or anytime after appointment of a guardian.

Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, and unless the guardian is acting pursuant to an advance directive, before withholding or withdrawing life-sustaining treatment other than antibiotics.

Unless the guardian is acting pursuant to an advance directive, before consenting to a do-not-resuscitate order or clinician order for life-sustaining treatment, as defined in

18 V.S.A. § 9701(6)

, unless a clinician as defined in

18 V.S.A. § 9701(5)

certifies that the person under guardianship is likely to experience cardiopulmonary arrest before court approval can be obtained. In such circumstances, the guardian shall immediately notify the court of the need for a decision, shall obtain the clinician’s certification prior to consenting to the do-not-resuscitate order or clinician order for life-sustaining treatment, and shall file the clinician’s certification with the court after consent has been given.

The requirements of subdivision (1)(C) of this subsection shall not apply if obtaining a court order would be impracticable due to the need for a decision before court approval can be obtained. In such circumstances, the guardian shall immediately notify the court by telephone of the need for a decision, and shall notify the court of any decision made.

The procedures in 18 V.S.A. chapter 181 shall be the exclusive mechanism to obtain approval for administration of nonemergency involuntary psychiatric medication to a person under guardianship.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 76

, § 15;

2007, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2013, No. 127

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 10, 2014.

§ 3076.
Annual reports; final accounting; fees.

The guardian shall file an annual report with the appointing court within 30 days of the anniversary date of the appointment.

The annual report shall contain:

a financial accounting as required by section 2921 of this title if the guardian has been granted power over income and resources pursuant to subdivision 3069(c)(4) of this title;

a report on the progress and condition of the person under guardianship, including his or her health, medical and dental care, residence, education, employment, and habilitation;

a report on the manner in which the guardian carried out his or her powers and fulfilled his or her duties; and

the guardian’s opinion regarding the continued need for guardianship.

If the guardian has been granted power over income and resources pursuant to subdivision 3069(c)(4) of this title, at the termination of the guardianship, the guardian shall render a final accounting as required by section 2921 of this title.

Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, the guardian shall not be paid any fees to which he or she may be entitled, or reimbursed for any of his or her expenses from the estate of the person under guardianship until the annual reports or final accounting required by this section has been filed with the court.
(d) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, the guardian shall not be paid any fees to which he or she may be entitled, or reimbursed for any of his or her expenses from the estate of the person under guardianship until the annual reports or final accounting required by this section has been filed with the court.

The guardian may at any time apply by motion to the Probate Division of the Superior Court for payment of fees or reimbursement of expenses incurred as a result of the guardianship. The court may grant the motion and approve payment if it finds the expenses were reasonable and supported by documentary evidence.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 76

, § 15; amended

2007, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 3077.
Termination and modification of guardianship.

A person under guardianship or any person interested in the welfare of the person under guardianship may file a motion for termination or modification of the guardianship. Grounds for the termination or modification of the guardianship shall include:

the death of the guardian;

the failure of the guardian to file an annual report, or the failure to file such report in a timely manner;

the failure of the guardian to act in accord with an order of the court;

a change in the ability of the person under guardianship to manage his or her personal care or financial affairs;

a change in the capacity or suitability of the guardian for carrying out his or her powers and duties, including any current or past expressed preferences of the person under guardianship to have an alternative person appointed as guardian.

After notice and hearing, the court may terminate or modify the guardianship, appoint a successor guardian, or restrict the powers of a guardian, consistent with the court’s findings and conclusions of law.

Notice and hearing on the motion shall proceed in the manner set forth in sections 3064 and 3068 of this title.

Marriage of the person under guardianship shall not extinguish a guardian’s authority.

The following guardianship powers shall remain for up to two years after the death of a person under guardianship or until the appointment of an executor or administrator of the person’s estate:

the power to arrange and pay for a funeral;

the power to request medical, financial, or other records of the person in guardianship;

the power to request an autopsy and to obtain the results thereof;

the power to make and file a financial accounting; and

any other powers which are incidental to the closing of and accounting for the guardianship and which are fully reported to the Probate Division of the Superior Court.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 76

, § 15; amended

1985, No. 144

(adj. Sess.), § 161;

2007, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2009, No. 3

, § 12a, eff. Sept. 1, 2009;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.